Washington statutes.
RCW 26.04.200

Penalty for violations—1939 c 204.

Any person intentionally violating any provision of RCW 26.04.140 through 26.04.190 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1939 c 204 s 8; RRS s 8450-7.]

NOTES:

Punishment of misdemeanor when not fixed by statute: RCW 9.92.030.